District of Columbia statutes.
28:2-102

Scope; certain security and other transactions excluded from this article.

Unless the context otherwise requires, this article applies to transactions in goods; it does not apply to any transaction which although in the form of an unconditional contract to sell or present sale is intended to operate only as a security transaction nor does this article impair or repeal any statute regulating sales to consumers, farmers or other specified classes of buyers.

History

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 639, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:2-102.
1973 Ed., § 28:2-102.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Prior Uniform Statutory Provision: Section 75, Uniform Sales Act.

Changes: Section 75 has been rephrased.

Purposes of Changes and New Matter: To make it clear that:

The Article leaves substantially unaffected the law relating to purchase money security such as conditional sale or chattel mortgage though it regulates the general sales aspects of such transactions. “Security transaction” is used in the same sense as in the Article on Secured Transactions (Article 9).

Cross Reference: Article 9.

Definitional Cross References: “Contract”. Section 1-201.

“Contract for sale”. Section 2-106.

“Present sale”. Section 2-106.

“Sale”. Section 2-106.